de: Typ des Hilfsqueue-Kopfes: Kreuz; Verlängert; Flach; Elchkopf; Schiene; Spinne; Standard; Schwan; X-Brücke; Sonstiges
nl: Keusteunkop type: Kruis; Verlengd; Plat; Elandenkop; Rail; Spin; Standaard; Zwaan; X-brug; Overig
it: Tipo di testa Bridge: Croce; Allungata; Piatta; Alce; Binario; Ragno; Standard; Cigno; Ponte a X; Altro
sl-SI: Vrsta glave mostička: Križ; Podaljšano; Ravno; Moosehead; Žleb; Pajek; Standardno; Labod; Križni mostiček (X mostiček); Drugo
fr: Type de tête de chevalet: Croix; Allongée; Plate; Tête d’élan; Rail; Araignée; Standard; Cygne; Chevalet en X; Autre
pt-PT: Tipo de suporte para cabeças de taco: Cruz; Estendido; Plano; Cabeça de alce; Banda; Aranha; Padrão; Cisne; Ponte em X; Outro
da: Brohovedtype: Kryds; Udvidet; Flad; Elghoved; Skinne; Edderkop; Standard; Svane; X-bro; Andet
hr-HR: Vrsta glave mosta: Križ; Produženi; Ravni; Moosehead; Rubni; Pauk; Standardni; Labud; X most; Ostalo
zh-CN: 杆头类型: 十字形; 加长形; 扁平形; 驼鹿头形; 轨道形; 蜘蛛形; 标准形; 天鹅形; X 形架杆头; 其他
pt-BR: Tipo de cabeça da ponte: Cruz; Estendida; Plana; Cabeça de alce (Moosehead); Trilho; Aranha; Padrão; Cisne; Ponte X; Outros
vi: Loại đầu cầu cơ: Hình chữ thập; Mở rộng; Phẳng; Sừng nai; Bám thành bàn; Con nhện; Tiêu chuẩn; Cổ thiên nga; Chữ X; Khác
sk-SK: Typ hlavy mostíka: Kríž; Predĺžená; Plochá; Losia hlava; Koľajnička; Pavúk; Štandardná; Labuť; Kríž X; Iné
cs: Typ hlavy můstku: Kříž; Prodloužená; Plochá; Sobí hlava; Mantinel; Pavouk; Standardní; Labuť; X-můstek; Jiné
bg-BG: Тип на главата на моста: Кръст; Удължена; Плоска; Лосова глава; За мантинела; Паяк; Стандартна; Лебед; Х-образен мост; Друго
lt-LT: Tiltelio galvutės tipas: Kryžminis; Ilgintas; Plokščias; Briedžio ragų; Borto; Vorinis; Standartinis; Gulbės kaklo; X formos; Kitas
zh-TW: 架桿器類型: 十字型; 加長型; 平扁型; 駝鹿角型; 軌道型; 蜘蛛型; 標準; 天鵝型; X 型; 其他
tr: Köprü başlığı tipi: Çapraz; Uzatılmış; Düz; Geyik kafası; Raylı; Örümcek; Standart; Kuğu; X köprü; Diğer
ru: Тип головки мостика: Крест; Удлиненная; Плоская; Голова лося; Рельсовая; Паук; Стандартная; Лебедь; X-образная; Другое
ja: Bridgeヘッドタイプ: クロス; エクステンデッド; フラット; ムースヘッド; レール; スパイダー; スタンダード; スワン; Xブリッジ; その他
hu: Hosszabbító híd fejtípusa: Kereszt; Bővített; Lapos; Jávorszarvasfej; Perem; Pók; Normál; Hattyú; X-híd; Egyéb
th: ประเภทหัวสะพาน: ไม้กากบาท; แบบยาว; แบบแบน; ทรงหัวกวางมูส; แบบราง; ทรงสไปเดอร์; มาตรฐาน; ทรงคอหงส์; เรสต์รูปตัว X; อื่นๆ
pl: Typ główki mostka: Krzyżak; Wydłużona; Płaska; Głowa łosia; Szynowa; Pająk; Standardowa; Łabędź; X (Krzyżak); Inna
ko: 브리지 헤드 유형: 크로스; 익스텐디드; 플랫; 무스헤드; 레일; 스파이더; 표준; 스완; X 브리지; 기타
sv: Typ av brygga: Kors; Förlängd; Platt; Älghuvud; Sarg; Spindel; Standard; Svan; X-brygga; Övrigt
fi: Sillan pään tyyppi: Risti; Pidennetty; Tasainen; Hirvenpää; Kisko; Hämähäkki; Vakio; Joutsen; X-silta; Muu
es: Tipo de cabezal del puente: Cruz; Extendido; Plano; Cabeza de alce; Riel; Araña; Estándar; Cisne; Puente en X; Otro
en: Bridge head type: Cross; Extended; Flat; Moosehead; Rail; Spider; Standard; Swan; X Bridge; Other
ro-RO: Tipul capului de pod: Cruce; Extins; Plat; Cap de elan; Șină; Păianjen; Standard; Lebădă; Punte X; Altele
el: Τύπος κεφαλής Bridge: Σταυρός; Εκτεταμένη; Επίπεδη; Κεφάλι ταράνδου; Ράγας; Αράχνη; Τυπική; Κύκνος; Γέφυρα X; Άλλη
nb: Brohodetype: Kryss; Utvidet; Flat; Elghode; Skinne; Edderkopp; Standard; Svane; X-bro; Annet